Maine, session 132, LD2021.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3477, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2003, c. 653, §10, is further
amended to read:
2. Reports. Reports regarding abuse, neglect or exploitation must be made
immediately by telephone to the department either by telephone or by an online portal
designated by the department and must be followed by a written report within 48 hours if
requested by the department. The reports must contain the name and address of the
involved adult; information regarding the nature and extent of the abuse, neglect or
exploitation; the source of the report; and the name of the person making the report;, that
person's occupation; and where that person can be contacted. The report may contain any
other information that the reporter believes may be helpful.
Page 1 - 132LR2797(02)